Washington statutes.
RCW 25.10.856

Partner—Payment demand—Entitlement.

(1) A partner who demands payment retains all other rights of a partner until the proposed merger becomes effective.

(2) A partner sent a dissenters' notice who does not demand payment by the date set in the dissenters' notice is not entitled to payment for the partner's partnership interest under this article.

[ 2009 c 188 s 1206.]